District of Columbia statutes.
50-2201.09

Severability.

If any provision of this part is declared unconstitutional, or the applicability thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of the part and the applicability of such provision to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

History

Mar. 3, 1925, 43 Stat. 1126, ch. 443, § 18

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-723.
1973 Ed., § 40-615.